Massachusetts, session 194th, S2869.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 132 of the acts of 2019, or any
general or special law to the contrary, the data advisory commission established pursuant to said
section 17 of chapter 132 of the acts of 2019 shall study and make recommendations within their
annual report on the rationale and capacity of the department of elementary and secondary
education to publish and report:
(i) student-specific data provided by school committees and charter schools pursuant to:
section 1I of Chapter 69; sections 37G, 37H, 37O, 37P, and 89 of Chapter 71 of the General
Laws; sections 3 and 7 of Chapter 71A of the General Laws; section 6 of Chapter 71B of the
General Laws; section 2A of Chapter 72 of the General Laws; statewide assessment data utilized
as a basis for competency determinations pursuant to section 1D of chapter 69 of the General
Laws; and any other data required by the United States Department of Education;
(ii) said data in subsection (i) in a manner that can be cross-tabulated by: each major
racial and ethnic group; gender; low income status; high needs status; English learner status; and
of 6

category of disability, if applicable; and presented statewide and also disaggregated by school
district and individual school in a manner that is anonymized and does not reveal personally
identifiable information about any individual student;
(iii) the number of children, by grade level, within each disability category receiving
specific special education services, including but not limited to: each related service; assistive
technology, including but not limited to augmentative and alternative communication;
supplementary aids and services; behavioral intervention plans; vocational education; travel
training; and community-based transition services;
(iv) said data in subsection (iii) that can be cross-tabulated by each major racial and
ethnic group; gender; low income status; high needs status; and English learner status of children
by age level, including but not limited to delivery of: each related service; assistive technology,
including but not limited to augmentative and alternative communication; supplementary aids
and services; behavioral intervention plans; vocational education; travel training; and
community-based transition services; provided, that said information shall be presented
statewide and also disaggregated by school district and individual school in a manner that is
anonymized and does not reveal personally identifiable information about any individual student;
and
(v) whether there is a statistically significant increase in the rates of assignment of
students with disabilities to substantially separate classrooms for any racial or ethnic group
compared to the average of the prior 3 years.
(b) The department shall publish the data that is determined by the data advisory
commission to have rationale to be published, be within the department’s capacity, and does not
of 6

reveal personally identifiable information about any individual student beginning with data
collected from the 2027-2028 school year. The department shall report all categories of data that
the department determines cannot be publicly disclosed and does not reveal personally
identifiable information about any individual student to the clerks of the house of representatives
and the senate, the house and senate committees on ways and means, and the joint committee on
education, including an explanation for the reason these data are not able to be published
publicly.
SECTION 2. Section 1B of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the seventh paragraph the following paragraph:-
The board shall annually publish a supplemental report containing student achievement
data for each approved private day or residential special education school or program. The data
shall include student performance on the statewide assessment system approved by the board
under section 1I.
SECTION 3. Section 1I of said chapter 69, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
striking out, in line 250, the word “and”.
SECTION 4. Said section 1I of said chapter 69, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “learners”, in line 252, the following words:- ; and (i) the
number of children, by grade level, within each disability category receiving specific special
education services, including but not limited to: each related service, as defined in 20 U.S.C.
1400 et seq; assistive technology, including but not limited to augmentative and alternative
communication; supplementary aids and services; behavioral intervention plans; vocational
education; travel training; and community-based transition services.
of 6

SECTION 5. Section 6 of said chapter 71B, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by inserting after the word “assignment”, in line 6, the following words:- or pattern of delivery of
specific special education services.
SECTION 6. Said chapter 71B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10 the following new section:-
Section 10A. Each private special education school or program that enrolls students
funded by the commonwealth or its political subdivisions shall file annual reports with the
department of elementary and secondary education. Each approved private special education
school or program and special education school that enrolls students funded by the
commonwealth shall annually prepare financial statements, including: (1) a statement of net
assets; (2) a statement of revenues, expenditures, and changes in net assets; and (3) such
supplemental statements and schedules that may be required by the department. Each school or
program shall annually conduct an audit which shall include, but not be limited to, its financial
statements consistent with the generally accepted governmental auditing standards. Each school
or program shall file a report with the audit and any related management letters annually on or
before January 1 for the previous fiscal year with the department and the state auditor and shall
submit a copy of the audit report and any related management letters to each school district that
enrolled students in the private special education school during the period covered by the audit
report.
The audited financial statements, accompanying notes and schedules shall disclose, but
not be limited to: (1) transactions between the private special education school and any related
for profit or non-profit organization; (2) transactions or contracts related to the purchase, sale or
of 6

lease of real estate property; (3) the names, duties and total compensation of the 5 most highly
compensated employees; (4) the amounts expended on administration and overhead; (5)
information on programs and services provided by the school, including the cost effectiveness of
such programs and services; and (6) any other items that may be required by regulation.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary of
education shall, in consultation with the department of elementary and secondary education, the
department of early education and care, and the operational services division, study and make
recommendations regarding the oversight of approved private day or residential special
education schools or programs.
The recommendations shall provide information on topics including, but not limited to:
(1) best practices of licensing, monitoring and oversight of approved private day or residential
special education schools or programs; (2) the collection of data related to providing appropriate
educational programming; (3) the collection of data related to providing the most appropriate
services to students in approved private day or residential special education schools or programs;
(4) consideration of the relevant aspects of the statute governing education collaboratives, as
defined in section 4E of Chapter 40, and their potential application to approved private day or
residential special education schools or programs; (5) the collection of data relevant to the
structure for congregate care for students and review of the appropriate agency placement
policies; and (6) best practices for workforce development, including but not limited to staffing
models, trainings, and professional development. In developing recommendations, the secretary
100 of education, the department of elementary and secondary education, the department of early
101 education and care, and the operational services division shall consult with and solicit input from
102 various persons and groups, including but not limited to, the department of developmental
of 6

103 services; the division of local services; the Massachusetts Association of Approved Special
104 Education Schools; the executive directors of approved private day or residential special
105 education schools or programs of varying size and scope throughout the commonwealth;
106 organizations representing individuals with developmental disabilities; district directors of
107 special education throughout the commonwealth; organizations representing children with
108 disabilities and their parent or legal guardian; and associations representing special education
109 administrators and other education administrators, school officials, and municipal officials.
110 The secretary of education shall file a report, including any analysis or recommendations,
111 with the clerks of the house of representatives and senate not later than 12 months following the
112 passage of this act.
of 6